src-fst-stems-verbs.lexc.md
# Mansi verb stems

## List of the lexica:

* V11_odd  =  воруӈкве
* V11_even =
* V12_odd  =  аюӈкве
* V12_even =  сэрхаяӈкве
* V13_odd  =  минуӈкве
* V13_even =  атхатуӈкве
* V14_odd  =  солюӈкве
* V14_even =
* V15_odd  =
* V15_even =
* V16_odd  =
* V16_even =
* V21_odd  =
* V21_even =
* V22_odd  =
* V22_even =  хо̄лувъяӈкве
* V23_odd  =  котыртахтуӈкве
* V23_even =  хо̄нтыгла̄ӈкве
* V25_odd  =  нёрсуӈкве
* V25_even =
* V26_odd  =  ра̄пщуӈкве
* V26_even =
* V27_odd  =  кинсуӈкве
* V27_even =
* V28_odd  =
* V28_even =
* V31_odd  =  пувтмуӈкве
* V31_even =
* V33_odd  =
* V33_even =
* V35_odd  =
* V35_even =

## The lexica themselves

**LEXICON Verbs** is the list of all verbstems

* а̄гмалтаӈкве+V:а̄гмалт V_A "23_even_определить" ; 
* а̄йтынтахтуӈкве+V:а̄йтынтахт V_U "23_odd_тошнить" ;
* а̄лмаяӈкве+V:а̄лмай V_A "12_even_поднять" ;
* а̄лмта̄луӈкве+V:а̄лмта̄л V_U "13_even_носить /на руках/" ;
..., some 3500 verbs.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-mns/blob/main/src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc)</small>

---
